Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 138.510 (3) and (4), at any time before December
30, 2024, a person may  file a petition for post-conviction relief under ORS 138.510 to 138.680
claiming, as grounds for relief, that the person was  convicted of a criminal offense as the
result of a nonunanimous jury verdict.
(2) ORS 138.550 does not apply to  petitions for post-conviction relief described in this
section.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 138.530, in  a post-conviction relief proceeding claiming, as
grounds for relief, that the person was convicted of a criminal offense as  the result of a
nonunanimous jury verdict, the petitioner has the burden of  proving, by a preponderance of
the evidence, that the conviction resulted from a nonunanimous jury verdict.
(b) Evidence that a jury verdict was nonunanimous is limited to:
(A) A verdict form;
(B) A written jury poll;
(C) An audio or video recording of the trial; or
(D) A transcript of the trial.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of  this subsection, if a recording or transcript of the
trial reflects that the jury was polled after issuing the verdict, but either does  not indicate
or is  ambiguous concerning whether the verdict was unanimous, the court may order a re-
view in camera of the file of the district attorney, the  defense attorney or the court, relating
to the underlying conviction,  and may consider any evidence concerning the jury’s verdict
within the file or files that the court determines to be credible.
(d) This subsection applies to petitions for post-conviction relief filed  on or after the ef-
fective date of this 2023 Act.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 138.520, if post-conviction relief  is granted under this section,
the court shall vacate the judgment as to the specific conviction that resulted from the
nonunanimous jury verdict, or grant such other relief as stipulated by the parties.
(5) A petitioner with an appeal pending in an  appellate court on the effective date of this
2023 Act, from a judgment on  a petition under ORS 138.510 to 138.680, may by motion seek
Enrolled Senate Bill 321 (SB 321-B) Page 1
leave of the appellate court to vacate  the judgment and remand to the circuit court so that
the petitioner may file an amended petition  indicating the petitioner’s intent to proceed un-
der the provisions of this section. Upon the  receipt of such a motion, the appellate court
may vacate the judgment and remand to the circuit court if:
(a) The petition asserted as grounds for relief either that  the petitioner was convicted
of a criminal offense as the result of a nonunanimous jury verdict,  or that counsel was in-
effective for a reason related to the petitioner’s conviction  resulting from a nonunanimous
jury verdict; and
(b) The motion  described in this subsection is filed within 90 days after the effective date
of this 2023 Act.
(6) If a judgment of conviction  is vacated on the grounds that the person was convicted
of a criminal offense as the result of a nonunanimous jury verdict, upon  retrial, if the trial
court determines that evidence  other than witness testimony that was previously admitted
during the trial that resulted in the nonunanimous  guilty verdict is unavailable because the
evidence was lawfully destroyed  or otherwise rendered unavailable through no fault of the
state or the defendant,  or that the evidence is unavailable despite reasonable efforts to pre-
serve the evidence:
(a) The state may  present in the state’s case in chief or rebuttal case, and the defendant
may present in the defendant’s case in chief,  a transcript or portion thereof, a recording of
the prior proceeding or portion thereof, or any other previously admitted exhibit, concerning
the unavailable evidence from the previous trial.
(b) The court shall instruct the jury:
(A) That the evidence is unavailable;
(B) That the jury may not  attribute the unavailability to the state or the defendant, or
fault either party for failing to produce the unavailable evidence; and
(C) That the jury may not speculate as to why the evidence is unavailable.
(c) The court may not instruct the jury pursuant to ORS 10.095 (7) or (8) regarding  the
transcripts, recordings of the prior proceeding  or exhibits described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(7) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all provisions of ORS 138.510  to 138.680
apply to petitions for post-conviction relief described in this section.
(8) As used in this section, “conviction” includes a finding of guilty except for insanity.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
(2) The repeal of section 1 of this 2023 Act does not affect:
(a) A petition or amended petition for post-conviction  relief described in section 1 of this
2023 Act filed within the time limitations described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(b) A retrial resulting from the vacating of a  conviction pursuant to section 1 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 3.
 Section 1, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) A person may petition for  compensation for wrongful conviction against the state if
all of the following requirements are satisfied:
(a) The person was convicted of one or more felonies  and subsequently imprisoned as a result
of the conviction or convictions;
(b)(A) The person’s conviction was reversed or vacated  and either the charges were dismissed
or on retrial the person was found not guilty; or
(B) The person received a grant of gubernatorial pardon;
(c) The person did not commit the crime or crimes  for which the person was convicted and was
not an accessory or accomplice to or otherwise involved in the acts that were the basis of the
conviction; and
(d) The person did  not commit perjury, fabricate evidence or by the person’s own conduct cause
or bring about the conviction. A confession or  admission later found to be false or a guilty plea does
Enrolled Senate Bill 321 (SB 321-B) Page 2
not constitute committing perjury, fabricating evidence or causing or bringing about the conviction
under this paragraph.
(2) For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Reversal or vacation of a conviction because the conviction was obtained following  a finding
of guilt by  a nonunanimous jury is not[ , by itself, ] sufficient to prove that the person did not commit
the crime or crimes for which the person was convicted.
(b) “Convicted” or “conviction” includes an  adjudication of a person within the jurisdiction of
the juvenile court under ORS 419C.005 for an act committed  when the person was under 18 years
of age if the adjudication  resulted in the person’s placement in custody of the Oregon Youth Au-
thority or the Department of Corrections for at least one year.
(3) A person may file a  petition for compensation under this section in the Circuit Court for
Marion County or in the circuit court for  the county of conviction. The petitioner shall serve the
petition on the Attorney General, who shall represent the state in all proceedings  on the petition.
The petitioner shall also mail a copy of  the complaint to the District Attorney of the county of
conviction.
(4)(a) A petition under this section is a civil action.  The Oregon Rules of Civil Procedure and
the Oregon Evidence Code apply to a petition under this section unless otherwise specified  in this
section.
(b) The court, in exercising its discretion  regarding the weight and admissibility of evidence
submitted under this section, may in the interest of justice give due  consideration to difficulties of
proof caused by the passage of time, the death or unavailability of witnesses, the destruction of ev-
idence or other factors not caused by a petitioner or those acting  on a petitioner’s behalf. The court
may not diminish the petitioner’s burden of proof as set forth in subsection (5)(a) of this section.
(c) The fact finder in a proceeding under this section may receive proof by declarations,  depo-
sitions, oral testimony or other competent evidence, including but not limited to transcripts  of tes-
timony or documents and evidence filed with the court in any proceeding that gave  rise to the
conviction, reversal or vacation of the conviction, or from retrial following reversal.
(5)(a) If a petitioner proves the elements of subsection (1) of this section by a preponderance  of
the evidence, the court shall enter a judgment awarding damages as follows:
(A) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, $65,000 for each  year of
imprisonment, as adjusted under subsection (8) of this section; and
(B) $25,000, as adjusted under subsection (8)  of this section, for each additional year served on
parole or post-prison supervision or each additional year  the petitioner was required to register as
a sex offender, whichever is greater.
(b) A petitioner is not entitled  to damages for any period of incarceration during which the
petitioner was concurrently serving a sentence for a  conviction of another crime for which the
petitioner was lawfully incarcerated.
(c) Punitive damages may not be awarded under this section.
(6)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, the court shall order that an award
under subsection (5) of this section be paid as a combination of an  initial payment not to exceed
$100,000 or 25 percent of the award, whichever is greater, and the remainder  as an annuity not to
exceed $80,000 per year.  The petitioner shall designate a beneficiary or beneficiaries for the annuity.
(b) The court may order that the award be paid in one lump sum if the court finds that it is  in
the best interests of the petitioner.
(7) In addition to the damages awarded under subsection (5) of this section, the court:
(a) Shall award  to the petitioner reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in connection with
a petition filed under this section;
(b) Shall award to the petitioner reimbursement for all restitution, assessments,  fees, court costs
and all other sums paid by the  petitioner as required by pretrial orders, incarceration, and the
judgment and sentence in any proceeding that gave rise to  the conviction, reversal or vacation of
the conviction, or from retrial following reversal; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 321 (SB 321-B) Page 3
(c) May award to the petitioner access to existing  state, local or other programs that provide
services, including, but not limited to, counseling, housing assistance, eligibility  for medical assist-
ance as defined in ORS 414.025, educational assistance, job  training, legal services to regain custody
of children, assistance with food and transportation and personal financial literacy assistance,  as
appropriate.
(8) Beginning in 2023, and every year thereafter, the State Court Administrator  shall determine
the percentage increase or decrease in the cost  of living for the previous calendar year, based on
changes in the Consumer Price Index for All  Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as pub-
lished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics  of the United States Department of Labor. On or before
July 1 of  the year in which the State Court Administrator makes the determination required by this
subsection, the State Court  Administrator shall adjust the amounts prescribed under subsection (5)
of this section for the following calendar year by multiplying  the amounts applicable to the calendar
year in which the adjustment is made by the percentage amount determined  under this subsection.
The adjustment may not exceed three percent for any year. The State Court Administrator  shall
round the adjusted limitation amount to the nearest $100, but the unrounded  amount shall be used
to calculate  the adjustments to the amounts in subsequent calendar years. The adjusted amounts
become effective on July 1 of the year in which the adjustment is made, and apply to all  petitions
filed under this section on or after July 1 of that year and before July 1 of the subsequent year.
(9)(a) If,  on the date a judgment is entered under subsection (5) of this section, the petitioner
has won  a monetary award against a public body as defined in ORS 174.109 in a separate civil action
related to the same subject, or has entered  into a settlement agreement with a public body as de-
fined in ORS 174.109 related to the  same subject, the amount of economic damages awarded in the
separate action or received in the settlement agreement, less any sums  paid to litigate the other
civil action or obtain the settlement agreement, including, but not  limited to, attorney fees, costs
and expert fees, shall be deducted from the sum of  money to which the petitioner is entitled under
this section. The court shall include in the judgment an award to the  state of any amount deducted
pursuant to this subsection.
(b) If  paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply and if, after the date the judgment is en-
tered under subsection (5) of this section, the petitioner wins a  monetary award against a public
body as defined in ORS 174.109  in a separate civil action related to the same subject, or enters into
a settlement agreement with a public body as defined  in ORS 174.109 related to the same subject,
the petitioner shall reimburse the state for  the sum of money paid under the judgment entered under
subsection (5) of this section, less any sums paid to litigate the other  civil action or obtain the
settlement agreement, including, but not limited to, attorney fees, costs and expert fees. A re-
imbursement required under this subsection may not exceed the amount of the economic damages
awarded in the separate civil action or received in the settlement agreement.
(c) An award under this section shall not be offset by any expenses incurred by a  public body
as defined in ORS 174.109 to secure the petitioner’s custody or conviction, or to feed, clothe,  house
or provide medical services to the petitioner as a result of the petitioner’s incarceration.
(10) Compensation  awarded as a result of a petition for compensation for wrongful conviction
under this section is excluded from gross income and is not subject to taxation.
(11) A petition under this section is not subject to ORS 30.260 to 30.300.
(12)(a) If the petitioner prevails on a petition under this section, the petitioner may request that
judgment include a certificate of innocence finding that the petitioner was innocent  of all crimes for
which the petitioner was wrongfully convicted.
(b) Upon entry of a judgment  granting a petition under this section, the court shall order the
associated convictions and arrest records be set aside  and sealed from all applicable state and fed-
eral systems pursuant to this subsection. The court shall enter  the set aside order regardless of
whether the petitioner has other criminal convictions or pending criminal cases.
(13) Notwithstanding ORS 12.115, a petition under this section must be filed no later than two
years after:
Enrolled Senate Bill 321 (SB 321-B) Page 4
(a) The date of dismissal  of the criminal charges against the petitioner or finding of not guilty
on retrial, whichever is later; or
(b) The grant of pardon to the petitioner.
(14) Any party to a proceeding under this section may appeal from the  judgment of the circuit
court on a petition filed under this section by filing a notice of appeal  within the time and in the
manner specified in ORS chapter 19 for civil appeals  to the Court of Appeals. Any party filing a
notice of appeal under this subsection must note in the notice of appeal  that the case is subject to
this subsection.  For purposes of any appeals under this section, the Attorney General shall represent
the state  in all appellate proceedings. The party filing the notice of appeal shall serve the notice
of appeal on the Attorney General and on the district attorney for the county of conviction.
(15) This section does not preclude  the Department of Corrections from providing reentry ser-
vices to a petitioner under this section that are provided to other  persons, including, but not limited
to, financial assistance, housing assistance, mentoring and  counseling. Services may be provided
while an action is pending and after any judgment is entered, as appropriate for the petitioner.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 321 (SB 321-B) Page 5